Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.060

Statement for registration—Contents.

(1) The applicant for registration shall file a statement with the department which shall include:

(a) The name and address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will appear on the label, if other than the applicant's;

(b) The name of the pesticide;

(c) The complete formula of the pesticide, including the active and inert ingredients: PROVIDED, That confidential business information of a proprietary nature is not made available to any other person and is exempt from disclosure as a public record, as provided by RCW 42.56.070;

(d) Other necessary information required for completion of the department's application for registration form; and

(e) A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all claims to be made for it, including the directions and precautions for use.

(2) The director may require a full description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which the claims are based.

(3) The director may prescribe other necessary information by rule.

[ 2005 c 274 s 215; 1989 c 380 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 6.]